North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 11. North Carolina School for the Deaf at Morganton. [Repealed]

§ 116-120.
[Repealed]

Transferred to G.S. 115-336 by Session Laws 1963, c. 448, s. 28.

§§ 116-121 through 116-124.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1963, c. 448, s. 28.

§ 116-124.1.
[Repealed]

Transferred to G.S. 115-342 by Session Laws 1963, c. 448, s. 28.

§ 116-125.
[Repealed]

Transferred to G.S. 115-343 by Session Laws 1963, c. 448, s. 28.